Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 29 Voter Choice Act

17-29-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Voter Choice Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 386, § 1.

17-29-2.
Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Majority rule is a fundamental principle of representative democracy, and the state’s election laws should uphold and facilitate this principle.

In an election where more than two (2) candidates are running for an office, the candidate who receives a plurality of the votes may actually be opposed by the majority of voters.

The state’s current voting method limits voters’ choices and contributes to lower voter participation.

It is in the public interest to examine Rhode Island’s voting method and consider comprehensive reforms that would expand the choices realistically available to voters, increase participation, address the concerns of the major political parties, save money, and increase accountability.

The general assembly further finds and declares that instant runoff voting and other advanced voting methods have the potential to:

Expand the range of choices available to voters by allowing them to vote for candidates of minor political parties or unaffiliated candidates without fear of giving an advantage to the candidate they least prefer;

Reduce both election administration costs and campaign expenditures by combining primary and general elections; and

Promote campaigns that are more positive and focused on issues because candidates will seek to appeal to opponents’ supporters as a second choice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 386, § 1.

17-29-3.
Voter choice study commission — Established — Definitions.

The voter choice study commission is hereby established for the purpose of studying instant runoff voting and other advanced voting methods.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “Advanced voting method” means a voting method that allows an elector to indicate a preference for more than one candidate in an election and that determines the winner of the election by majority vote. “Advanced voting method” includes, but is not limited to, instant runoff voting, approval voting, range voting, and proportional voting.

The voter choice study commission shall consist of sixteen (16) members selected as follows:

Eight (8) members to be appointed by the speaker of the house, no more than five (5) of whom shall be from the same political party, and at least three (3) of whom shall be the clerk of a city or town of this state;

Eight (8) members to be appointed by the president of the senate, no more than five (5) of whom shall be from the same political party, at least three (3) of whom shall be the clerk of a city or town of this state; and

Provided, that all members of the study commission shall be registered voters of this state at the time of their selection and at all times while they remain on said study group.

Members of the voter choice study group shall be appointed no later than August 1, 2012.

The voter choice study commission shall:

Study advanced voting methods;

Analyze the requirements for implementing advanced voting methods, including public education, voting equipment and technology, ballot designs, the costs of conducting the pilot project established by this chapter and using advanced voting methods in elections for state and federal offices, and savings due to the elimination of primary elections;

Determine the level of public support for a change in voting methods;

Review the experience of other states in conducting elections using advanced voting methods;

Recommend statutory changes to implement advanced voting methods in elections for state and federal offices to be held in the state in 2014;

Make recommendations on making all voting systems used in the state compatible with advanced voting methods by 2014, including a review of the availability and costs of necessary voting equipment;

Make recommendations to the governing bodies and designated election officials of political subdivisions of the state on preparing to conduct an election using an advanced voting methods; and

Consider changes to the state’s statutes governing access to the ballot for presidential candidates.

The voter choice study commission shall present a report on its work to the general assembly, the governor, and the secretary of state no later than November 1, 2013.

The director of research of the legislative council and the director of the office of legislative legal services shall provide staff assistance to the voter choice study commission.

The members of the voter choice study commission shall serve without compensation; except that the members shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 499, § 1.